Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.902

References to the hospital commission—1989 1st ex.s. c 9.

All references to the hospital commission in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the secretary or the department of health.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 803.]